Vermont, session 2025-2026, H396.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 2614 is added to read:
§ 2614. MOLLIE BEATTIE DISTINGUISHED SERVICE AWARD
In commemoration of the centennial of the Vermont State Parks in the
Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation and in honor of the conservation
and public land accessibility values of the late former Commissioner of
Forests, Parks and Recreation, Mollie Beattie, there is created the Mollie
Beattie Distinguished Service Award. Annually, the Commissioner of Forests,
Parks and Recreation shall present this award to either a current or former State
employee or partner whose contributions honor the legacy of Mollie Beattie in
advancing the conservation, accessibility, quality of recreational experience, or
sustainability of Vermont’s public lands.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: May 27, 2025
VT LEG #384092 v.1